Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,137
No-passing zones; exception.

(1) The Department of Transportation and local authorities may determine those portions of any highway under their respective jurisdictions where overtaking and passing or driving to the left of the center of the roadway would be especially hazardous and may by appropriate signs or markings on the roadway indicate the beginning and end of such zones. When such signs or markings are in place and clearly visible to an ordinarily observant person, every driver of a vehicle shall obey such indications.

(2) Where signs or markings are in place to define a no-passing zone, no driver shall at any time drive on the left side of the roadway within such no-passing zone or on the left side of any pavement striping designed to mark such no-passing zone throughout its length.

(3) This section shall not apply (a) under the conditions described in subdivision (1)(b) of section 60-6,131 or (b) to the driver of a vehicle turning left into or from an alley, private road, or driveway unless otherwise prohibited by signs.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 26;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-626;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 233;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 198.